Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256I.04, subdivision 2c, is amended to read: Subd. 2c. Background study requirements. (a) deleted text begin Effective July 1, 2016,deleted text end A provider of housing support must initiate background studies in accordance with chapter 245C of the following individuals: (1) controlling individuals as defined in section 245A.02; (2) managerial officials as defined in section 245A.02; and (3) all employees and volunteers of the establishment who have direct contact with recipients, or who have unsupervised access to recipients, their personal property, or their private data. (b) The provider of housing support must maintain compliance with all requirements established for entities initiating background studies under chapter 245C. (c) deleted text begin Effective July 1, 2017,deleted text end A provider of housing support must demonstrate that all individuals required to have a background study according to paragraph (a) have a notice stating either that: (1) the individual is not disqualified under section 245C.14; or (2) the individual is disqualified, but the individual has been issued a set-aside of the disqualification for that setting under section 245C.22. new text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), providers of supportive housing and emergency shelter are not required to initiate background studies under chapter 245C. new text end